Utah statutes.
34-19-10.   Injunctive relief -- Contempt -- Penalty.
Punishment for a contempt, specified in Section 34-19-9, may be by fine, not
exceeding $100, or by imprisonment not exceeding fifteen days in the jail of
the county where the court is sitting, or both, in the discretion of the
court. Where a person is committed to jail for the nonpayment of such a fine,
he must be discharged at the expiration of fifteen days; but where he is also
committed for a definite time, the fifteen days must be computed from the
expiration of the definite time.
